Nevada, session 83, AB265.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 533 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. If the State Engineer assigns a committee within the
Division of Water Resources of the State Department of
Conservation and Natural Resources to review an application for
a permit to appropriate water or to change the place of diversion,
manner of use or place of use, the Division shall notify the
applicant of the assignment and the date on which the application
will be reviewed by the committee.
2. The review of an application pursuant to subsection 1 must
be completed not later than:
(a) Thirty days after the final date for filing a protest pursuant
to NRS 533.365, if no protests were filed during the period for
filing a protest; or
-
*AB265*

– 3 –
(b) Sixty days after the final date for filing a protest pursuant
to NRS 533.365, if a protest was filed during the period for filing a
protest.
Sec. 2. NRS 533.355 is hereby amended to read as follows:
533.355 1. Upon receipt of an application, the State Engineer
shall make an endorsement thereon of the date of its receipt and
shall keep a record of the date. The State Engineer shall provide the
application forms at no cost to the applicants.
2. Except as provided in subsection 3, if upon examination, the
application is found to be defective, it must be returned for
correction or completion with advice of the reasons therefor, and the
date of the return must be endorsed upon the application and a
record made of it in the Office of the State Engineer. An application
does not lose its priority of filing on account of defects if the
application, properly corrected and accompanied by such maps and
drawings as may be required, is filed in the Office of the State
Engineer within 60 days after the date of the return to applicant.
Any application returned for correction or completion, not refiled in
proper form within the 60 days, must be cancelled. For good cause
shown, upon application made prior to the expiration of the 60-day
period, the State Engineer may, in his or her discretion, grant an
extension of time not to exceed 60 days in which to file the
instruments. The State Engineer shall approve or deny an
application for an extension of time not later than 30 days after
the date the application is received by the State Engineer.
3. If it appears to the State Engineer that an application, which
contains information of sufficient accuracy to determine the manner
of use and the location from which the water is to be diverted, must
be rejected, the State Engineer may reject it without returning it for
correction.
4. All applications which comply with the provisions of this
chapter must be recorded in a suitable book kept for that purpose.
Sec. 3. NRS 533.370 is hereby amended to read as follows:
533.370 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 533.0241, 533.345, 533.371, 533.372 and 533.503, the State
Engineer shall approve an application submitted in proper form
which contemplates the application of water to beneficial use if:
(a) The application is accompanied by the prescribed fees;
(b) The proposed use or change, if within an irrigation district,
does not adversely affect the cost of water for other holders of water
rights in the district or lessen the efficiency of the district in its
delivery or use of water; and
(c) The applicant provides proof satisfactory to the State
Engineer of the applicant’s:
-
*AB265*

– 4 –
(1) Intention in good faith to construct any work necessary to
apply the water to the intended beneficial use with reasonable
diligence; and
(2) Financial ability and reasonable expectation actually to
construct the work and apply the water to the intended beneficial use
with reasonable diligence.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection [10,] 11, where
there is no unappropriated water in the proposed source of supply,
where the groundwater that has not been committed for use has been
reserved pursuant to NRS 533.0241 or where its proposed use or
change conflicts with existing rights or with protectable interests in
existing domestic wells as set forth in NRS 533.024, or threatens to
prove detrimental to the public interest, the State Engineer shall
reject the application and refuse to issue the requested permit. If a
previous application for a similar use of water within the same basin
has been rejected on those grounds, the new application may be
denied without publication.
3. In addition to the criteria set forth in subsections 1 and 2, in
determining whether an application for an interbasin transfer of
groundwater must be rejected pursuant to this section, the State
Engineer shall consider:
(a) Whether the applicant has justified the need to import the
water from another basin;
(b) If the State Engineer determines that a plan for conservation
of water is advisable for the basin into which the water is to be
imported, whether the applicant has demonstrated that such a plan
has been adopted and is being effectively carried out;
(c) Whether the proposed action is environmentally sound as it
relates to the basin from which the water is exported;
(d) Whether the proposed action is an appropriate long-term use
which will not unduly limit the future growth and development in
the basin from which the water is exported; and
(e) Any other factor the State Engineer determines to be
relevant.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection and
subsections 6 , 7 and [10] 11 and NRS 533.365, the State Engineer
shall approve or reject each application within 2 years after the final
date for filing a protest. The State Engineer may postpone action:
(a) Upon written authorization to do so by the applicant.
(b) If an application is protested.
(c) If the purpose for which the application was made is
municipal use.
(d) In areas where studies of water supplies have been
determined to be necessary by the State Engineer pursuant to
NRS 533.368.
-
*AB265*

– 5 –
(e) Where court actions or adjudications are pending, which may
affect the outcome of the application.
(f) In areas in which adjudication of vested water rights is
deemed necessary by the State Engineer.
(g) On an application for a permit to change a vested water right
in a basin where vested water rights have not been adjudicated.
(h) Where authorized entry to any land needed to use the water
for which the application is submitted is required from a
governmental agency.
(i) On an application for which the State Engineer has required
additional information pursuant to NRS 533.375.
5. If the State Engineer does not act upon an application in
accordance with subsections 4 and 6, the application remains active
until approved or rejected by the State Engineer.
6. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection and
subsection [10,] 11, the State Engineer shall approve or reject,
within 6 months after the final date for filing a protest, an
application filed to change the point of diversion of water already
appropriated when the existing and proposed points of diversion are
on the same property for which the water has already been
appropriated under the existing water right or the proposed point of
diversion is on real property that is proven to be owned by the
applicant and is contiguous to the place of use of the existing water
right. The State Engineer may postpone action on the application
pursuant to subsection 4.
7. Not later than 30 days after the final date for filing a
protest pursuant to NRS 533.365, if no protests were filed during
the period for filing a protest, the State Engineer shall approve or
reject an application to appropriate water that results in a
nonconsumptive use.
8. If the State Engineer has not approved, rejected or held a
hearing on an application within 7 years after the final date for filing
a protest, the State Engineer shall cause notice of the application to
be republished and reposted pursuant to NRS 533.360 immediately
preceding the time at which the State Engineer is ready to approve
or reject the application. The cost of the republication must be paid
by the applicant. After such republication and reposting, a protest
may be filed in accordance with NRS 533.365.
[8.] 9. If a hearing is held regarding an application, the
decision of the State Engineer must be in writing and include
findings of fact, conclusions of law and a statement of the
underlying facts supporting the findings of fact. The written
decision may take the form of a transcription of an oral ruling. The
rejection or approval of an application must be endorsed on a copy
of the original application, and a record must be made of the
-
*AB265*

– 6 –
endorsement in the records of the State Engineer. The copy of the
application so endorsed must be returned to the applicant. Except as
otherwise provided in subsection [11,] 12, if the application is
approved, the applicant may, on receipt thereof, proceed with the
construction of the necessary works and take all steps required to
apply the water to beneficial use and to perfect the proposed
appropriation. If the application is rejected, the applicant may take
no steps toward the prosecution of the proposed work or the
diversion and use of the public water while the rejection continues
in force.
[9.] 10. If a person is the successor in interest of an owner of a
water right or an owner of real property upon which a domestic well
is located and if the former owner of the water right or real property
on which a domestic well is located had previously filed a written
protest against the granting of an application, the successor in
interest must be allowed to pursue that protest in the same manner
as if the successor in interest were the former owner whose interest
he or she succeeded. If the successor in interest wishes to pursue the
protest, the successor in interest must notify the State Engineer in a
timely manner on a form provided by the State Engineer.
[10.] 11. The provisions of subsections 1 to [9,] 10, inclusive,
do not apply to an application for an environmental permit or a
temporary permit issued pursuant to NRS 533.436 or 533.504.
[11.] 12. The provisions of subsection [8] 9 do not authorize
the recipient of an approved application to use any state land
administered by the Division of State Lands of the State Department
of Conservation and Natural Resources without the appropriate
authorization for that use from the State Land Registrar.
[12.] 13. As used in this section, “domestic well” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 534.350.
Sec. 4. NRS 533.380 is hereby amended to read as follows:
533.380 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection [5,] 6,
in an endorsement of approval upon any application, the State
Engineer shall:
(a) Set a time before which the construction of the work must be
completed, which must be within 5 years after the date of approval.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, set a time
before which the complete application of water to a beneficial use
must be made, which must not exceed 10 years after the date of the
approval. The time set under this paragraph respecting an
application for a permit to apply water to a municipal or quasi-
municipal use on any land:
(1) For which a final subdivision map has been recorded
pursuant to chapter 278 of NRS;
-
*AB265*

– 7 –
(2) For which a plan for the development of a project has
been approved by the local government pursuant to NRS 278.010 to
278.460, inclusive; or
(3) On any land for which a plan for the development of a
planned unit development has been recorded pursuant to chapter
278A of NRS,
 must not be less than 5 years.
2. The State Engineer may limit the applicant to a smaller
quantity of water, to a shorter time for the completion of work, and,
except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of subsection 1, to a
shorter time for the perfecting of the application than named in the
application.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection [4] 5 and NRS
533.395 and 533.4377, the State Engineer may, for good cause
shown, grant any number of extensions of time within which
construction work must be completed, or water must be applied to a
beneficial use under any permit therefor issued by the State
Engineer, but a single extension of time must not exceed 5 years.
The State Engineer shall approve or deny an application for an
extension of time not later than 30 days after the date the
application is received by the State Engineer.
4. An application for [the] an extension of time submitted
pursuant to subsection 3 must in all cases be:
(a) Made within 30 days following notice by registered or
certified mail that proof of the work is due as provided for in NRS
533.390 and 533.410; and
(b) Accompanied by proof and evidence of the good faith and
reasonable diligence with which the applicant is pursuing the
perfection of the application.
 The State Engineer shall not grant an extension of time unless the
State Engineer determines from the proof and evidence so submitted
that the applicant is proceeding in good faith and with reasonable
diligence to perfect the application. The failure to provide the proof
and evidence required pursuant to this subsection is prima facie
evidence that the holder is not proceeding in good faith and with
reasonable diligence to perfect the application.
[4.] 5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection [5] 6 and
NRS 533.395, whenever the holder of a permit issued for any
municipal or quasi-municipal use of water on any land referred to in
paragraph (b) of subsection 1, or for any use which may be served
by a county, city, town, public water district or public water
company, requests an extension of time to apply the water to a
beneficial use, the State Engineer shall, in determining whether to
grant or deny the extension, consider, among other factors:
-
*AB265*

– 8 –
(a) Whether the holder has shown good cause for not having
made a complete application of the water to a beneficial use;
(b) The number of parcels and commercial or residential units
which are contained in or planned for the land being developed or
the area being served by the county, city, town, public water district
or public water company;
(c) Any economic conditions which affect the ability of the
holder to make a complete application of the water to a beneficial
use;
(d) Any delays in the development of the land or the area being
served by the county, city, town, public water district or public
water company which were caused by unanticipated natural
conditions; and
(e) The period contemplated in the:
(1) Plan for the development of a project approved by the
local government pursuant to NRS 278.010 to 278.460, inclusive; or
(2) Plan for the development of a planned unit development
recorded pursuant to chapter 278A of NRS,
 if any, for completing the development of the land.
[5.] 6. The provisions of subsections 1 and [4] 5 do not apply
to an environmental permit or a temporary permit issued pursuant to
NRS 533.436 or 533.504.
[6.] 7. For the purposes of this section, the measure of
reasonable diligence is the steady application of effort to perfect the
application in a reasonably expedient and efficient manner under all
the facts and circumstances. When a project or integrated system is
composed of several features, work on one feature of the project or
system may be considered in finding that reasonable diligence has
been shown in the development of water rights for all features of the
entire project or system.
[7.] 8. The State Engineer shall:
(a) Adopt any regulation necessary to carry out the provisions of
this section; and
(b) Provide a copy of such regulations to any person upon
request.
Sec. 5. NRS 533.386 is hereby amended to read as follows:
533.386 1. [The] Not later than 14 days after the date a
report of conveyance required by paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of
NRS 533.384 is filed with the State Engineer, the State Engineer
shall review the report to confirm that the report [of conveyance
required by paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of NRS 533.384] includes
all material required by that subsection and that:
(a) The report is accompanied by the prescribed fee;
-
*AB265*

– 9 –
(b) No conflict exists in the chain of title that can be determined
by the State Engineer from the conveyance documents or other
information on file in the Office of the State Engineer; and
(c) The State Engineer is able to determine the rate of diversion
and the amount of water conveyed in acre-feet or million gallons
from the conveyance documents or other information on file in the
Office of the State Engineer.
2. If the State Engineer confirms a report of conveyance
pursuant to subsection 1, the State Engineer shall [in a timely
manner] within the time required pursuant to subsection 1 provide
a notice of the confirmation to the person who submitted the report
of conveyance. The notice must include, without limitation:
(a) A statement indicating that neither the confirmation of the
report of conveyance nor the report of conveyance, if the report sets
forth the amount of water conveyed, guarantees that:
(1) The water right is in good standing with the Office of the
State Engineer; or
(2) The amount of water referenced in the notice or in the
report of conveyance is the actual amount of water that a person is
entitled to use upon conveyance of the application or permit to
appropriate any of the public waters, the certificate of appropriation,
the adjudicated or unadjudicated water right, or the application or
permit to change the place of diversion, manner of use or place of
use of water.
(b) A statement that the confirmation of the report of
conveyance is not a determination of ownership and that only a
court of competent jurisdiction may adjudicate conflicting claims to
ownership of a water right.
3. If the State Engineer determines that the report of
conveyance is deficient, the State Engineer shall within the time
required pursuant to subsection 1 reject the report of conveyance
and return it to the person who submitted it, together with:
(a) An explanation of the deficiency; and
(b) A notice stating that the State Engineer will not confirm a
report of conveyance that has been rejected unless the report is
resubmitted with the material required to cure the deficiency. The
notice must also include a statement of the provisions of
subsection 5.
4. If, from the conveyance documents or other information in
the Office of the State Engineer, it appears to the State Engineer that
there is a conflict in the chain of title, the State Engineer shall
within the time required pursuant to subsection 1 reject the report
of conveyance and return it to the person who submitted it, together
with:
-
*AB265*

– 10 –
(a) An explanation that a conflict appears to exist in the chain of
title; and
(b) A notice stating that the State Engineer will not take further
action with respect to the report of conveyance until a court of
competent jurisdiction has determined the conflicting claims to
ownership of the water right and the determination has become final
or until a final resolution of the conflicting claims has otherwise
occurred. The notice must also include a statement of the provisions
of subsection 5.
5. The State Engineer shall not consider or treat the person to
whom:
(a) An application or permit to appropriate any of the public
waters;
(b) A certificate of appropriation;
(c) An adjudicated or unadjudicated water right; or
(d) An application or permit to change the place of diversion,
manner of use or place of use of water,
 is conveyed as the owner or holder of the application, right,
certificate or permit for the purposes of this chapter, including,
without limitation, all advisements and other notices required of the
State Engineer and the granting of permits to change the place of
diversion, manner of use or place of use of water, until a report of
the conveyance is confirmed pursuant to subsection 1.
6. If the State Engineer is notified that a court of competent
jurisdiction has entered a judgment confirming ownership of a water
right or resolving a conflict in a chain of title, and that the judgment
has become final, the State Engineer shall take such administrative
action as is appropriate or necessary to conform the records of the
Office of the State Engineer with the judgment of the court,
including, without limitation, amending or withdrawing a permit or
certificate that was previously approved by the State Engineer.
Sec. 6. NRS 533.390 is hereby amended to read as follows:
533.390 1. Any person holding a permit from the State
Engineer shall, on or before the date set for the completion of the
work, file in detail a description of the work as actually constructed.
This statement must be verified by the affidavit of the applicant or
the applicant’s agent or attorney. The State Engineer shall notify
the holder of the permit not later than 30 days before the date set
for the completion of the work that the permit will be held for
cancellation if the statement is not filed by the date set for the
completion of the work.
2. Should any person holding a permit from the State Engineer
fail to file with the State Engineer the proof of completion of work,
as provided in this chapter, the State Engineer shall advise the
holder of the permit, by registered or certified mail, that it is held for
-
*AB265*

– 11 –
cancellation, and should the holder, within 30 days after the mailing
of such advice, fail to file the required affidavit, the State Engineer
shall cancel the permit. For good cause shown, upon application
made prior to the expiration of the 30-day period, the State Engineer
may, in his or her discretion, grant an extension of time in which to
file the instruments. The State Engineer shall approve or deny an
application for an extension of time not later than 30 days after
the date the application was received by the State Engineer.
Sec. 7. NRS 533.400 is hereby amended to read as follows:
533.400 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection [2,] 3,
on or before the date set in the endorsement of a permit for the
application of water to beneficial use, or on the date set by the State
Engineer under a proper application for extension therefor, any
person holding a permit from the State Engineer to appropriate the
public waters of the State of Nevada, to change the place of
diversion or the manner or place of use, shall file with the State
Engineer a statement under oath, on a form prescribed by the State
Engineer. The statement must include:
(a) The name and post office address of the person making the
proof.
(b) The number and date of the permit for which proof is made.
(c) The source of the water supply.
(d) The name of the canal or other works by which the water is
conducted to the place of use.
(e) The name of the original person to whom the permit was
issued.
(f) The purpose for which the water is used.
(g) If for irrigation, the actual number of acres of land upon
which the water granted in the permit has been beneficially used,
giving the same by 40-acre legal subdivisions when possible.
(h) An actual measurement taken by a licensed state water right
surveyor or an official or employee of the Office of the State
Engineer of the water diverted for beneficial use.
(i) The capacity of the works of diversion.
(j) If for power, the dimensions and capacity of the flume, pipe,
ditch or other conduit.
(k) The average grade and difference in elevation between the
termini of any conduit.
(l) The number of months, naming them, in which water has
been beneficially used.
(m) The amount of water beneficially used, taken from actual
measurements, together with such other data as the State Engineer
may require to become acquainted with the amount of the
appropriation for which the proof is filed.
-
*AB265*

– 12 –
2. The State Engineer shall notify the holder of the permit not
later than 30 days before the date set for filing in the permit or the
date set by an extension granted by the State Engineer that the
permit will be held for cancellation pursuant to NRS 533.410 if
the statement required pursuant to this section and accompanying
map, if a map is required pursuant to NRS 533.405, is not filed by
the date set for filing.
3. The provisions of subsection 1 do not apply to a person
holding an environmental permit or a temporary permit issued
pursuant to NRS 533.436 or 533.504.
Sec. 8. NRS 533.410 is hereby amended to read as follows:
533.410 1. If any holder of a permit from the State Engineer
fails, before the date set for filing in the permit or the date set by any
extension granted by the State Engineer, to file with the State
Engineer proof of application of water to beneficial use, and the
accompanying map, if a map is required, the State Engineer shall
advise the holder of the permit, by registered or certified mail, that
the permit is held for cancellation. If the holder, within 30 days after
the mailing of this notice, fails to file with the State Engineer the
required affidavit and map, if a map is required, or an application
for an extension of time to file the instruments, the State Engineer
shall cancel the permit. For good cause shown, upon application
made before the expiration of the 30-day period, the State Engineer
may grant an extension of time in which to file the instruments. The
State Engineer shall approve or deny an application for an
extension of time not later than 30 days after the date the
application was received by the State Engineer.
Sec. 9. NRS 533.435 is hereby amended to read as follows:
533.435 1. The State Engineer shall collect the following
fees:

For examining and filing an application for a
permit to appropriate water .................................... $360.00
This fee includes the cost of publication,
which is $50.
For reviewing a corrected application or map, or
both, in connection with an application for a
water right permit ..................................................... 100.00
For examining and acting upon plans and
specifications for construction of a dam................ 1,200.00
For examining and filing an application for each
permit to change the point of diversion,
manner of use or place of use of an existing
right .......................................................................... 240.00
-
*AB265*

– 13 –
This fee includes the cost of publication,
which is $50.
For examining and filing an application for a
temporary permit to change the point of
diversion, manner of use or place of use of an
existing right ........................................................... $180.00
For issuing and recording each permit to
appropriate water for any purpose, except for
generating hydroelectric power which results
in nonconsumptive use of the water, watering
livestock or wildlife purposes .................................. 360.00
plus $3 per acre-foot approved or fraction
thereof.
Except for generating hydroelectric power,
watering livestock or wildlife purposes, for
issuing and recording each permit to change
an existing water right whether temporary or
permanent for any purpose ....................................... 300.00
plus $3 per acre-foot approved or fraction
thereof.
For issuing and recording each permit for
additional rate of diversion from a well where
no additional volume of water is granted .............. 1,000.00
For issuing and recording each permit to change
the point of diversion or place of use of an
existing right whether temporary or
permanent for irrigation purposes, a
maximum fee of ....................................................... 750.00
For issuing and recording each permit to
appropriate or change the point of diversion
or place of use of an existing right whether
temporary or permanent for watering
livestock or wildlife purposes .................................. 240.00
plus $50 for each cubic foot of water per
second approved or fraction thereof.
For issuing and recording each permit to
appropriate or change an existing right
whether temporary or permanent for water
for generating hydroelectric power which
results in nonconsumptive use of the water.............. 480.00
plus $50 for each cubic foot per second of
water approved or fraction thereof.
For filing and examining a request for a waiver
in connection with an application to drill a
well ........................................................................... 120.00
-
*AB265*

– 14 –
For filing and examining a notice of intent to
drill a well ................................................................ $25.00
For filing and examining an affidavit to
relinquish water rights in favor of use of
water for domestic wells .......................................... 300.00
For filing a secondary application under a
reservoir permit ........................................................ 300.00
For approving and recording a secondary permit
under a reservoir permit ........................................... 540.00
For reviewing each tentative subdivision map .............. 180.00
plus $1 per lot.
For reviewing and approving each final
subdivision map ....................................................... 120.00
For storage approved under a dam permit for
privately owned nonagricultural dams which
store more than 50 acre-feet ..................................... 480.00
plus $1.25 per acre-foot storage capacity.
This fee includes the cost of inspection
and must be paid annually.
For flood control detention basins ................................. 480.00
plus $1.25 per acre-foot storage capacity.
This fee includes the cost of inspection
and must be paid annually.
For filing proof of completion of work ........................... 60.00
For filing proof of beneficial use ..................................... 60.00
For issuing and recording a certificate upon
approval of the proof of beneficial use ..................... 350.00
For filing proof of resumption of a water right ............. 360.00
For filing any protest ....................................................... 30.00
For filing any application for extension of time
within which to file proofs, of completion or
beneficial use, for each year for which the
extension of time is sought ....................................... 120.00
For filing any application for extension of time
to prevent a forfeiture, for each year for
which the extension of time is sought ...................... 120.00
For reviewing a cancellation of a water right
pursuant to a petition for review .............................. 360.00
For examining and filing a report of conveyance
filed pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection
1 of NRS 533.384 ..................................................... 120.00
plus $20 per conveyance document.
For filing any other instrument ........................................ 10.00
-
*AB265*

– 15 –
For making a copy of any document recorded or
filed in the Office of the State Engineer, for
the first page ............................................................... $1.00
For each additional page .................................................... .20
For certifying to copies of documents, records or
maps, for each certificate ............................................. 6.00
For each copy of any full size drawing or map ................. 6.00
For each color copy of any full size drawing or
map (2′ x 3′) ............................................................... 12.00
For colored plots .............................................................. 10.00

2. When fees are not specified in subsection 1 for work
required of the Office of the State Engineer, the State Engineer shall
collect the actual cost of the work.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, all fees
collected by the State Engineer under the provisions of this section
must be deposited in the State Treasury for credit to the State
General Fund. All fees received for copies of any drawing or map
must be kept by the State Engineer and used only to pay the costs of
printing, replacement and maintenance of printing equipment. Any
publication fees received which are not used by the State Engineer
for publication expenses must be returned to the persons who paid
the fees. If, after exercising due diligence, the State Engineer is
unable to make the refunds, the State Engineer shall deposit the fees
in the State Treasury for credit to the State General Fund.
4. The State Engineer shall issue a permit not later than 14
days after receiving the applicable fee for the issuance and
recording of the permit required pursuant to subsection 1.
H
-
*AB265*